Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3311
Legal expense insurance policy; possible violations; director; report.

The director shall report to the Counsel for Discipline of the Nebraska Supreme Court any information of possible instances of overcharging for legal services, incompetence, or violations of the Nebraska Rules of Professional Conduct by lawyers who provide services in connection with a legal expense insurance policy.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 11;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 44;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 35.